Nebraska, session 109, LB844.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB844 LB844
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-12,146, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-12,146 (1) The Site and Building Development Fund is created. The
fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include
revenue from transfers by the Legislature, grants, private contributions,
repayment of loans, and all other sources. The Department of Economic
Development, as part of its comprehensive business development strategy,
shall administer the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Site
and Building Development Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer five million
dollars from the General Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund
for fiscal year 2022-23 and five million dollars from the General Fund to
the Site and Building Development Fund for fiscal year 2023-24. Such
money shall be placed in a subaccount of the Site and Building
Development Fund and earmarked for use to fund large shovel-ready
commercial and industrial sites developed under the Municipal Inland Port
Authority Act.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five
hundred thousand dollars from the Site and Building Development Fund for
fiscal year 2024-25 to the department to enter into one or more contracts
to conduct a comprehensive study or studies to identify and evaluate
large commercial and industrial sites in Nebraska that have the potential
to attract major investment and employment opportunities. The study shall
include consideration of super sites that encompass between five hundred
and one thousand acres and mega sites that encompass more than one
thousand acres. At least one proposed site shall be located west of the
one hundredth meridian in Nebraska. The contracts shall be awarded based
on a competitive selection process as determined by the department. The
-2-

LB844 LB844
2026 2026
studies shall be completed no later than December 15, 2024.
(b) The study shall assess the potential geographic locations; the
infrastructure assets that would be required for each site, including
highway, rail, and air transportation, and utilities such as water,
wastewater treatment, electrical power, and natural gas; the population
within fifty miles of each site and whether such population would be
sufficient to provide an adequate workforce for such site; and the
appropriate level of state investment necessary to position Nebraska as a
nationally or globally competitive location for site selection targeting
various sectors, including, but not limited to, advanced manufacturing,
trade, bioscience, agribusiness, warehousing and supply chain logistics,
technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, military support, and
life sciences. Such identified state investment levels may include, but
are not limited to, land acquisition costs and infrastructure
investments. The purpose of the study is to provide strategic insights
that will enable the state to attract major investment and employment
opportunities in order to support the growth of transformational
industries within Nebraska.
(c) The Director of Economic Development shall appoint an advisory
committee comprised of representatives of Nebraska economic development
organizations, equally representing each of Nebraska's three
congressional districts, to assist the department in identifying the
location of potential and preferred super sites and mega sites.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred
thousand dollars from the Site and Building Development Fund to the
Department of Economic Development for fiscal year 2026-27 for the
purpose of awarding a grant under subdivision (1)(m) of section
81-12,147.
Sec. 2. Section 81-12,147, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,147 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
-3-

LB844 LB844
2026 2026
the Department of Economic Development shall use the Site and Building
Development Fund to finance loans, grants, subsidies, credit
enhancements, and other financial assistance for industrial site and
building development and for expenses of the department as appropriated
by the Legislature for administering the fund. The following activities
are eligible for assistance from the fund:
(a) Grants or zero-interest loans to villages, cities, or counties
to acquire land, infuse infrastructure, or otherwise make large sites and
buildings ready for industrial development;
(b) Matching funds for new construction, rehabilitation, or
acquisition of land and buildings to assist villages, cities, and
counties;
(c) Technical assistance, design and finance services, and
consultation for villages, cities, and counties for the preparation and
creation of industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(d) Loan guarantees for eligible projects;
(e) Projects making industrial-ready sites and buildings more
accessible to business and industry;
(f) Infrastructure projects necessary for the development of
industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(g) Projects that mitigate the economic impact of a closure or
downsizing of a private-sector entity by making necessary improvements to
buildings and infrastructure;
(h) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
military value of military installations by making necessary improvements
to buildings and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, a grant
for the establishment of the United States Strategic Command Nuclear
Command, Control, and Communications public-private-partnership facility;
(i) A grant to a city of the second class that is served by two
first-class railroads, that is within fifteen miles of two state borders,
and that partners with public power utilities for purposes of expanding
-4-

LB844 LB844
2026 2026
electrical system capacities and enhancing redundancy and resilience;
(j) A grant of two million dollars to a city of the first class
located in the third congressional district if the property previously
housed a university or college that is no longer extant and if the
improvement and revitalization of the real property is for purposes of
supporting the housing, employment, and program needs of youth exiting
the foster care system. In addition, the real property may be used for
youth exiting juvenile court supervision in an out-of-home placement;
(k) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
value of cities of the second class that have partnered with the United
States Department of Defense or its contractors on upgrades to ground-
based nuclear deterrence. Such improvements include the construction of
electrical, drinking water, and clean water infrastructure; and
(l) Identification, evaluation, and development of large commercial
and industrial sites and building infrastructure to attract major
investment and employment opportunities for advanced manufacturing,
processing, trade, technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, life
science, and other transformational industries in Nebraska by means of
the department providing grants to or partnering with political
subdivisions, including inland port authorities under the Municipal
Inland Port Authority Act, or nonprofit economic development corporations
and entering into contracts for consulting, engineering, and development
studies to identify, evaluate, and develop large commercial and
industrial sites in Nebraska; and .
(m) A grant of one hundred thousand dollars to a nonprofit
organization for food distribution in a county with a population of more
than one hundred thousand and less than three hundred thousand
inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or
the most recent certified count by the United States Bureau of the
Census.
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall use the subaccount
-5-

LB844 LB844
2026 2026
of the Site and Building Development Fund described in subsection (2) of
section 81-12,146 to provide financial assistance to any inland port
authority created under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act to help
finance large shovel-ready commercial and industrial sites developed
under such act.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-12,146 and 81-12,147, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-